Utah statutes.
78B-8-405.   Construction.

Nothing in this part may be construed as prohibiting:

(1)  a person from voluntarily consenting to the request of a health care provider, as defined in Section 78B-3-403, to submit to testing following a significant exposure; or

(2)  a court from considering the petition of a health care provider for an order requiring that a person submit to testing to determine the presence of a disease if a significant exposure has occurred in connection with the health care provider's treatment of that person.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

